Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-1110.07
Accounting Division Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Accounting Division Cash Fund. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall consist of funds transferred from the State Building Renewal Assessment Fund and the Building Renewal Allocation Fund. The Accounting Division Cash Fund shall be used to finance the consolidation, implementation, operation, and migration of the state's existing enterprise resourcing planning (ERP) platform, the human resource management platform, an eProcurement platform, and other financial record-keeping platforms to an off-premise software driven platform or platforms. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2017, LB331, § 15.
May 16, 2017
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.